Missouri, session 2026, SB1045.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2 one new section, to be known as section 170.342, to read as
3 follows:
1 170.342. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of section
2 160.516 to the contrary, the state board of education shall
3 adopt and require that the history curriculum taught in the
4 seventh through twelfth grades include the following topics
5 of Native American history:
6 (1) A detailed history of indigenous Native American
7 society prior to the arrival of Christopher Columbus,
8 including, but not limited to, the initial migrations of
9 peoples from Australia, Mongolia, and the Pacific Islands
10 into the Americas and the growth and development of various
11 indigenous Native American civilizations, nations, and
12 tribes;
13 (2) That Columbus did not discover America, did not
14 travel farther west than the Caribbean Islands, and did not
15 know that North and South America lay to the west of the
16 Caribbean Islands;

SB 1045 2
17 (3) The murder, enslavement, and mutilation of
18 indigenous persons by Columbus, as well as Columbus's
19 stealing of gold and other property owned by such persons;
20 (4) That the three hundred thousand indigenous Native
21 Americans who resided on the island of Hispaniola at the
22 time of the arrival of Columbus were murdered, removed from
23 Hispaniola, and enslaved in Spain, or died from contracting
24 European diseases, resulting in the total genocidal
25 extermination of the indigenous Native American population
26 of Hispaniola within one hundred years of the arrival of
27 Columbus, such that not a single descendant of the
28 indigenous Native Americans who resided in Hispaniola at the
29 time Columbus invaded the island is alive today;
30 (5) A map identifying the name and approximate
31 geographic boundaries of each Native American nation and
32 tribe located in the present-day territory of the United
33 States at the time of the arrival of Columbus in the
34 Americas, as well as the estimated population of each such
35 nation and tribe at such time;
36 (6) That approximately ninety percent of the
37 indigenous Native American population, approximately fifty-
38 five million people, died as a result of the holocaust
39 inflicted upon them by the European military invasion and
40 colonization of the Americas, including a comparison between
41 the number of indigenous Native Americans residing in the
42 Americas at the time of the arrival of Columbus in the
43 Americas and the number of such persons currently residing
44 in the Americas;
45 (7) That approximately twelve million indigenous
46 Native Americans located in the present-day territory of the
47 United States died as a result of the holocaust inflicted

SB 1045 3
48 upon them upon the European military invasion and
49 colonization of the lands that became such territory;
50 (8) Specifically identify the various causes of the
51 deaths described in subdivisions (6) and (7) of this
52 subsection, including, but not limited to, the number of
53 such deaths resulting from contagious diseases contracted
54 from Europeans and the number of such deaths resulting from
55 military action against indigenous Native Americans by the
56 European invaders and their descendants during their
57 colonization of the Americas;
58 (9) A map identifying the name and approximate
59 geographic boundaries of each Native American nation and
60 tribe located in the present-day territories of the states
61 of Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Mississippi, North
62 Carolina, South Carolina, and Tennessee prior to the
63 forceful removal of such nations and tribes therefrom by the
64 United States Army due to the passage of the Indian Removal
65 Act of 1830;
66 (10) That forty-six thousand indigenous Native
67 Americans of the Cherokee Nation were forcefully removed
68 from Alabama and Georgia and relocated to Oklahoma, or
69 "Indian Territory", as a result of the Indian Removal Act of
70 1830, and that approximately ten percent or four thousand
71 six hundred of such persons died in the "Trail of Tears" as
72 a result of being forced by the United States Army to walk
73 from Alabama and Georgia to Oklahoma;
74 (11) That twenty-five million acres of fertile,
75 lucrative farmland were given away to white, illegal,
76 European immigrants who settled in Alabama, Arkansas,
77 Florida, Georgia, Mississippi, North Carolina, South
78 Carolina, and Tennessee when indigenous Native Americans
79 lost their homelands as a result of the passage of the

SB 1045 4
80 Indian Removal Act of 1830, and that the United States Army
81 forcefully removed those indigenous Native Americans from
82 their homelands and herded those indigenous Native Americans
83 into concentration camps in Oklahoma called reservations;
84 (12) The "Wounded Knee" massacre of indigenous Native
85 Americans and other such massacres of those indigenous
86 Native Americans by the United States Army;
87 (13) That two hundred and seventy million acres of
88 indigenous Native Americans' land was taken from them and
89 given to over one million white, illegal, European
90 immigrants as a result of the passage of the Homestead Act
91 of 1862 by the United States Congress;
92 (14) That, under the Homestead Act, each white,
93 illegal, European immigrant family was given one hundred and
94 sixty acres of indigenous Native Americans' farmland and
95 allowed to go for free to a land grant college or university
96 to learn agricultural techniques;
97 (15) That the Homestead Act resulted in the forceful
98 removal by the United States Army of millions of indigenous
99 Native Americans from their homelands in the "Northwest
100 Territory" after which such persons were herded into
101 concentration camps called reservations; and
102 (16) Such other topics of indigenous Native American
103 history as shall fully detail and tell the history or story
104 of indigenous Native Americans and the dispossession of
105 their lands and lives as a result of the European military
106 invasion, illegal immigration, and colonization of the
107 Americas, and particularly by the United States.
108 2. The state board of education shall adopt and
109 require that the history curriculum taught in the seventh
110 through twelfth grades include the following topics of
111 African American history:

SB 1045 5
112 (1) A detailed history of Africa, including, but not
113 limited to, the birth of humanity in Africa, initial
114 migrations of Africans out of Africa and into all continents
115 and islands of the Earth, the development of black African
116 civilizations, including, but not limited to, Egypt, Nubia,
117 Kush, Ethiopia, Mali, Ghana, Songhay, Benin, Kanem-Bornu,
118 and Great Zimbabwe; the effects of slavery and colonialism
119 upon African societies; African independence movements; and
120 modern-day Africa;
121 (2) Pre-Columbian contact between the indigenous
122 Native Americans and Africans, including contact,
123 visitation, interaction, and trade between Native Americans
124 with Egypt and Mali, as well as settlements of Egyptians and
125 Malians in both North and South America;
126 (3) The hypocrisy of the phrase "all men are created
127 equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain
128 unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty and
129 the Pursuit of Happiness" in the Declaration of
130 Independence, given the enslavement of millions of human
131 beings in the United States;
132 (4) Slavery provisions in the United States
133 Constitution;
134 (5) The distinction between lifetime chattel slavery
135 instituted in the Americas and old-world slavery;
136 (6) The economics of slavery;
137 (7) The following topics related to slavery in the
138 United States:
139 (a) Slave breeding;
140 (b) Buck breaking;
141 (c) The rape of slaves;
142 (d) The mutilation of slaves;
143 (e) The castration of slaves;

SB 1045 6
144 (f) The murder of slaves;
145 (g) The starvation of slaves;
146 (h) The poor clothing of slaves;
147 (i) Destroying slave families through the selling of
148 single members of slave families away from the family;
149 (j) Forcing slaves to work from sunup to sundown;
150 (k) The cruel and unusual punishment of slaves;
151 (l) The whipping of slaves;
152 (m) The shackling of slaves;
153 (n) A list of Presidents of the United States who
154 owned slaves, to wit, George Washington, Thomas Jefferson,
155 James Madison, James Monroe, Andrew Jackson, Martin Van
156 Buren, William Henry Harrison, John Tyler, James K. Polk,
157 Zachary Taylor, Andrew Johnson, and Ulysses S. Grant;
158 (o) Slave revolts;
159 (p) The burning and branding of slaves;
160 (q) The Fugitive Slave Act;
161 (r) The Underground Railroad;
162 (s) Prohibitions against teaching slaves how to read
163 and write; and
164 (t) Laws providing that conversion to Christianity did
165 not emancipate a slave;
166 (8) The participation of blacks in the Revolutionary
167 War and broken promises of freedom if they fought on the
168 side of the colonies;
169 (9) The participation of blacks in the Civil War;
170 (10) That as many as fifty million Africans lost their
171 lives during the four-hundred-year slave trade;
172 (11) The fact that the Emancipation Proclamation did
173 not free any slaves when issued by President Abraham Lincoln
174 due to the fact that Lincoln did not apply it to the four
175 slave states that did not secede from the Union,

SB 1045 7
176 specifically Missouri, Maryland, Delaware, and Kentucky, nor
177 to the three slave states that seceded but were under Union
178 control at the time of the Emancipation Proclamation,
179 specifically Louisiana, Virginia, and Tennessee, and that
180 the Emancipation Proclamation could not be enforced in the
181 remaining eight slave states that made up the Confederacy
182 since such states were under the control of the Confederacy;
183 (12) That over one million Africans remained enslaved
184 in the United States on June 19, 1865, "Juneteenth", since
185 the Emancipation Proclamation did not apply to all slaves in
186 the United States;
187 (13) That the emancipation of all slaves in the United
188 States occurred on December 6, 1865, the date the Thirteenth
189 Amendment to the United States Constitution was ratified
190 abolishing slavery in the United States;
191 (14) That the Thirteenth Amendment allowed one to be
192 enslaved for conviction of crime, which led to the former
193 Confederate slave states' passage of the "Black Codes",
194 which allowed for conviction of black people for trumped-up
195 crimes such as loitering and vagrancy, the imprisonment of
196 black people for such crimes, and the government leasing of
197 those black people to work, without pay, like slaves to
198 white-owned businesses, farmers, and manufacturers;
199 (15) The race massacres throughout the United States
200 following the Civil War, and particularly the bombing and
201 destruction of the black owned and occupied Rosewood
202 business and residential district of Tulsa, Oklahoma, and
203 East St. Louis, Illinois;
204 (16) The violent overthrow of elected black
205 governmental officials of Wilmington, North Carolina, by a
206 white seditionist mob with no response by the state or
207 federal governments;

SB 1045 8
208 (17) Black reconstruction of the South;
209 (18) The compromise ending reconstruction;
210 (19) Buffalo Soldiers;
211 (20) The participation of blacks in the Spanish-
212 American War, World War I, World War II, the Korean War, and
213 the Vietnam War;
214 (21) Discrimination against black veterans;
215 (22) Discrimination against black West Point cadets;
216 (23) Discrimination against black soldiers and attacks
217 against black soldiers coming home from wars;
218 (24) The forced retirement of the highest-ranking
219 black Army officer, Colonel Charles Young, in order to avoid
220 promoting him as the first black Brigadier General solely
221 because he was black;
222 (25) Black inventions and inability of black inventors
223 to get loans or investments to develop their inventions;
224 (26) President Woodrow Wilson's aid to the revival of
225 the Ku Klux Klan and Wilson's ordering segregation of
226 governmental facilities and employees during his term of
227 office between 1913 and 1921;
228 (27) Laws mandating discrimination and segregation on
229 the basis of race;
230 (28) The real estate practices of redlining and
231 restrictive covenants;
232 (29) Prohibitions against black athletes in
233 professional and amateur sports;
234 (30) Laws prohibiting interracial marriages;
235 (31) President Harry Truman's order to integrate the
236 military;
237 (32) The Voting Rights Act, Public Accommodations Act,
238 Fair Housing Act, Hate Crimes Act, and Equal Employment
239 Opportunity Act;

SB 1045 9
240 (33) The following Supreme Court cases: Dred Scott v.
241 Sandford, Plessy v. Ferguson, Brown v. Board of Education of
242 Topeka, Shelley v. Kraemer, and Missouri ex rel. Gaines v.
243 Canada;
244 (34) Significant African Americans in history;
245 (35) President Dwight Eisenhower's order for American
246 troops to protect black students integrating public schools;
247 (36) The civil rights movement;
248 (37) The counter intelligence program, "COINTELPRO",
249 the Federal Bureau of Investigation's conspiracy against
250 black civil rights leaders and groups;
251 (38) The freedom riders;
252 (39) The lynching of over four thousand African
253 Americans between 1877 and 1950;
254 (40) The Black Lives Matter movement, and the police
255 murders of unarmed black people;
256 (41) The Tuskegee experiment on black men by failing
257 to treat black men with syphilis to determine the effects of
258 untreated syphilis upon human beings;
259 (42) Painful and crippling gynecological experiments
260 on black women;
261 (43) Historically black colleges and universities; and
262 (44) Such other African American history as shall
263 fully detail and tell the history or story of Africans in
264 Africa, both before and after the European military invasion
265 and colonization of Africa and the enslavement of Africans,
266 including the European invaders and colonizers' violent
267 dispossession of Africans from their homelands, and of gold,
268 diamonds, and other minerals and natural resources; the
269 Europeans' deprivation of Africans of their human rights
270 both in the United States and in Africa; the African lives
271 and bodies lost as a result of the European invasion and

SB 1045 10
272 colonization of the Americas and Africa; and African
273 Americans' history in the United States.
✓